Utah statutes.
58-72-301.   License required -- License classification.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of acupuncture, except as specifically provided in Section  58-1-307 or 58-72-304.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of licensed acupuncturist.



Amended by Chapter 250, 2008 General Session

